Hawaii statutes.
§510-7 Representation in legal proceedings.
The person in whose name any community property stands is a necessary party in
all actions and other legal proceedings brought affecting the community
property, or arising out of the management of, control of, or dealing with such
property. Any other person having or claiming an interest in the property may
be but need not be joined as a party; provided that no judgment, decree, or
other order shall be enforced against any person except to the extent of the person's
interest in the community property, or against the separate property of the
person, unless the person is a party. This section is subject to any judgment
which may be entered pursuant to section 510-6. [L 1945, c 273, pt of §1; am L
1949, c 242, §3(c); RL 1955, §326-7; HRS §510-7; am L 1972, c 107, §1(b); gen
ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Joinder of parties, see HRCP rules 19, 20.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next